Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB321.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Mandatory Severance for Mass Layoffs Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Business." An individual, partnership, association, corporation or any person or group of persons that employs 50 or more employees."Change of control." A material change in ownership of an employer or a filing seeking bankruptcy protection."Covered employee." The following:(1) An individual who has been employed by an employer 123456789101112131415161718 for at least 90 days immediately before a change of control affecting that individual's principal place of employment. A change of control affects a covered employee's principal place of employment if the change of control results in the predecessor employer transferring control of the place of employment to the successor employer.(2) The term does not include:(i) a managerial, supervisory or confidential employee;(ii) a temporary employee; or(iii) a part-time employee who has worked less than 20 hours per week for the predecessor employer for at least 90 days immediately before the change of control."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employer." An individual, partnership, association, corporation or a person or group of persons acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee, including a person who, directly or indirectly, owns and operates the nominal employer or owns a corporate subsidiary that, directly or indirectly, owns and operates the nominal employer or makes the decision responsible for the employment action that gives rise to a mass layoff subject to notification."Establishment." A single place of employment that has been operated by an employer for more than three years, including a single location or a group of locations in this Commonwealth. The term does not include a temporary construction site."Facility." A building."Mass layoff." A reduction in force that is not the result of a transfer of operations or termination of operations and 20250SB0321PN0275 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that results in the termination of employment at an establishment during any 30-day period for 50 or more employees at or reporting to the establishment."Operating unit." An organizationally distinct product, operation or specific work function within or across facilities at a single establishment."Predecessor employer." The person who controls a business before a change of control."Principal place of employment." An office or other facility where an employee is principally assigned to work by a predecessor employer."Successor employer." A person who controls a business after a change of control."Termination of employment." The following:(1) The layoff of an employee without a commitment to reinstate the employee to the employee's previous employment within six months of the layoff.(2) The term does not mean:(i) voluntary departure;(ii) retirement;(iii) discharge;(iv) suspension for misconduct connected with employment;(v) layoff of a seasonal employee; or(vi) a situation in which an employer offers to an employee, at a location inside this Commonwealth and not more than 50 miles from the previous place of employment, the same employment or a position with equivalent status, benefits, pay and other terms and conditions of employment.20250SB0321PN0275 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A layoff under paragraph (1) of more than six months which, at its outset, was announced to be a layoff of six months or less, shall not be treated as a termination of employment if the extension beyond six months is caused by business circumstances not reasonably foreseeable at the time of the initial layoff and notice is given at the time it becomes reasonably foreseeable that the extension beyond six months will be required."Termination of operations." The following:(1) The permanent or temporary shutdown of a single establishment or of one or more facilities or operating units within a single establishment.(2) The term does not include a termination of operations made necessary because of a fire, flood, natural disaster, national emergency, act of war, civil disorder or industrial sabotage, decertification from participation in the Medicare and Medicaid programs as provided under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 7 (relating to Social Security) or license revocation under the laws of this Commonwealth."Total compensation." The following:(1) The combined value of a covered employee's wages and benefits immediately before a change of control. Total compensation may be paid entirely as wages or in any combination of wages and fringe benefits, to be determined by the successor employer.(2) The term includes a covered employee's hourly wage rate or the per diem value of the covered employee's monthly salary and the employer payments toward the covered employee's health and welfare and pension benefits."Transfer of operations." The permanent or temporary 20250SB0321PN0275 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transfer of a single establishment or one or more facilities or operating units within a single establishment to another location within or outside this Commonwealth."Transition period." A period of 180 days immediately following the effective date of a change of control.Section 3. Transfer of operations, termination of operations or mass layoff.(a) Notification.--If an establishment is subject to a transfer of operations or termination of operations which results, during any continuous period of not more than 30 days, in the termination of employment of 50 or more employees, or if an employer conducts a mass layoff, the employer who operates the establishment or conducts the mass layoff shall provide not less than 90 days, or the period of time required under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 23 (relating to worker adjustment and retraining notification), whichever is longer, before the first termination of employment occurs in connection with the transfer of operations, termination of operations or mass layoff, notification of the transfer of operations, termination of operations or mass layoff to:(1) the department;(2) the chief elected official of the municipality where the establishment is located;(3) each employee whose employment is to be terminated; and(4) any collective bargaining units of employees at the establishment.(b) Severance.--An employer subject to subsection (a) shall provide severance pay as follows:(1) The employer shall provide to each employee whose 20250SB0321PN0275 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employment is terminated severance pay equal to one week of pay for each full year of employment.(2) If the employer provides an employee with less than the number of days of notification required under subsection (a), the employer shall provide that employee with an additional four weeks of severance pay.(3) The rate of severance pay provided by the employer under this subsection shall be the average regular rate of compensation received during the employee's last three years of employment with the employer or the final regular rate of compensation paid to the employee, whichever rate is higher.(4) Severance pay under this subsection shall be regarded as compensation due to an employee for back pay and losses associated with the termination of the employment relationship, and earned in full upon the termination of the employment relationship, notwithstanding the calculation of the amount of the payment with reference to the employee's length of service.(5) Severance pay provided by the employer under this subsection shall be in addition to any severance pay provided by the employer under a collective bargaining agreement or for any other reason, except that any back pay provided by the employer to the employee under 29 U.S.C. § 2104 (relating to administration and enforcement of requirements) because of a violation of 29 U.S.C. § 2102 (relating to notice required before plant closings and mass layoffs) shall be credited toward meeting the severance pay requirements of this subsection.(6) Severance pay under this subsection shall not be subject to section 404(d) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd 20250SB0321PN0275 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law.(c) Qualification for notification.--In determining whether a transfer of operations, termination of operations or mass layoff is subject to the notification requirements of this section, any terminations of employment for two or more groups at a single establishment occurring within any 90-day period when each group has less than the number of terminations that would trigger the notification requirements of this section however the aggregate for all of the groups exceeds that number shall be regarded as subject to the notification requirements, unless the employer demonstrates that the cause of the terminations for each group is separate and distinct from the causes of the terminations for the other group or groups.(d) Approval of waiver.--A waiver of the right to severance provided under subsection (b) shall not be effective without approval of the waiver by the department or a court of competent jurisdiction.Section 4. Change of control.(a) Retention of employees.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a successor employer shall retain all covered employees for at least the transition period following a change of control, unless the department approves a reduction in the workforce under subsection (e). During the transition period, the successor employer may not terminate a covered employee without cause and may not reduce the total compensation of a covered employee.(2) A successor employer and a labor organization representing covered employees may, in a collective 20250SB0321PN0275 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bargaining agreement, provide that the agreement supersedes the requirements of this section.(b) Public notice.--(1) No later than 15 days before the effective date of a change of control, the predecessor employer shall:(i) Post public notice of the change of control at each principal place of employment.(ii) Send notice of the change of control to any labor organization that represents covered employees.(2) The notice shall include the name and contact information of the predecessor employer, the name and contact information of the successor employer and the effective date of the change of control.(3) The notice shall be posted at each principal place of business of the predecessor employer in a conspicuous place and in a manner that is readily viewable by covered employees.(c) Employee information.--No later than 15 days before the effective date of a change of control, a predecessor employer shall provide to the successor employer the name, address, date of hire, total compensation and classification of each covered employee.(d) Retention of records.--A successor employer shall retain the following written or electronic records for at least three years:(1) The information provided to the successor employer under subsection (c).(2) Any offer of employment made to a covered employee.(3) Any termination of a covered employee during a transition period, including the reasons for the termination.20250SB0321PN0275 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Any written evaluation of a covered employee.(e) Reduction of employees.--(1) For two years after the transition period, a successor employer may reduce the total number of employees who would have qualified as covered employees during the 90-day period immediately before a change of control only if approved by the department.(2) The department may not authorize a successor employer to reduce the number of employees under paragraph (1) except upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the employer has conducted a study of the nature and scope of the work performed by those employees proposed to be eliminated, and the study shows that the elimination of the employees is necessary for the continued solvency of the business.(3) A successor employer may terminate an employee with cause consistent with any applicable collective bargaining agreement during the period specified in paragraph (1).(f) Construction.--This section may not be construed to limit the right of covered employees to bring legal action for wrongful termination.(g) Rights and remedies.--The rights and remedies provided under this section are in addition to, and are not intended to supplant, any existing rights or remedies.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0321PN0275 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526